Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licenses and Examination

§ 1830.
Repealed. 2015, No. 38, § 18, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1831.
Qualifications for licensure.

To be eligible for licensure as an osteopathic physician, an applicant shall have attained the age of majority and shall provide evidence, acceptable to the Board, that he or she has satisfactorily completed all of the following:

A course of study in osteopathic education from an accredited school or college of osteopathic medicine as evidenced by a graduation certificate.

Documentation of no less than one year of an approved program of postgraduate training.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, an applicant shall pass the Comprehensive Osteopathic Medical Licensing Examination — USA (COMLEX) or the U.S. Medical Licensing Examination (USMLE) or their successor or equivalent examinations approved by the Board unless the applicant is exempt from all or a part of the examination under the provisions of section 1832 or 1832a of this title.

In addition to the requirements of this section, an applicant shall present evidence of good character and competence relating to his or her fitness to practice osteopathic medicine from the chief of service and two other active physician staff members at the hospital or institution where the applicant was last affiliated, if the applicant has been affiliated with a hospital or institution. The Board may seek evidence relating to the character and competence of the applicant from other sources. At the discretion of the Board, the applicant may present evidence relating to character and competence from different sources.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. March 29, 1972;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 49, 50;

1989, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 16.

§ 1832.
Examination.

The Board or its designee shall administer examinations to applicants for licensure at least twice each year if applications are pending. Examinations shall be designed and implemented to ensure that all applicants are admitted to practice unless there is good reason to believe that practice by a particular applicant would be inconsistent with the public health, safety, and welfare; they shall not be designed for the purpose of limiting the number of licensees.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 17.

§ 1832a.
Licensure without examination.

A person shall be entitled to licensure without examination if he or she is a diplomate of the National Board of Examiners for Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons.

A person shall be entitled to licensure without examination if, at the time of application, he or she produces satisfactory evidence of the following and, in the judgment of the Board, he or she is qualified in all respects for a license:

licensure in another U.S. or Canadian jurisdiction whose requirements are substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter; and

the person has been granted a diploma by an accredited school or college of osteopathic medicine.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 11; amended

2015, No. 38

, § 19, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1833.
Reexamination.

A person who fails to pass the Vermont examination required under section 1832 of this title may apply for reexamination and may, upon payment of the examination fee, sit for any regularly scheduled examination.
If an applicant does not pass the entire examination, the applicant shall not be required to retake any section of an examination that the applicant has previously passed.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 1834.
Limited temporary license.

An applicant for a limited temporary license shall meet the following requirements:

have attained the age of majority;

be a graduate of an accredited school or college of osteopathic medicine;

be appointed as an intern, resident, fellow, or medical officer in an approved hospital or in a clinic that is affiliated with an approved hospital, or in any hospital or institution maintained by the State, or in any clinic or outpatient clinic affiliated with or maintained by the State; and

pass Parts 1 and 2 of the Comprehensive Osteopathic Medical Licensing Examination — USA (COMLEX) or Parts 1 and 2 of the U.S. Medical Licensing Examination (USMLE) or their successor or equivalent examinations approved by the Board, unless the applicant is exempt from all or a part of the examination under the provisions of section 1832 or 1832a of this chapter.

The Board may grant a limited temporary license for a period of one year to an applicant who furnishes satisfactory proof of meeting the requirements set forth in subsection (a) of this section, and pays the required fee. A temporary license may be renewed or reissued only four times whether or not consecutive.

A limited temporary license shall entitle the applicant to practice only in the hospital or other institution designated on the applicant’s limited temporary license and in clinics or outpatient clinics operated by or affiliated with such designated hospital or institution and only under the direct supervision and control of an osteopathic or allopathic physician licensed under this chapter or chapter 23 of this title. The supervising physician shall provide the Board with information regarding the names and addresses of the supervising physician and the limited temporary licensee and the name of the hospital or other institution in which the person will practice.

The supervising physician shall be responsible for negligent or wrongful acts or omissions of the limited temporary licensee.

The limited temporary licensee shall at all times exercise the same standard of care and skill as an osteopathic physician, practicing in the same specialty, in the State of Vermont.

A limited temporary license shall expire upon occurrence of any of the following events:

The death or legal incompetency of the supervising physician.

Withdrawal of the filing by the supervising physician, provided the supervising physician gives 10 days’ written notice to the licensee and the hospital or institution.

A limited temporary license granted under this section shall expire immediately upon termination of the licensee’s appointment as intern, resident, fellow, or medical officer of the designated hospital or institution.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2015, No. 38

, § 20, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1835.
Repealed.
1989, No. 253 (Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 1836.
Biennial renewal of license; continuing education.

Licenses shall be renewed every two years.

Biennially, the Board shall forward a renewal form to each licensee. Upon receipt of the completed form, evidence of compliance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, and the renewal fee, the Board shall issue a new license.

As a condition of renewal a licensee shall complete a minimum of 30 hours of continuing medical education, approved by the Board by rule, during the preceding two-year period. At least 40 percent of these hours must be osteopathic medical education.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 51;

1989, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2013, No. 27

, § 20;

2015, No. 38

, § 21, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1837.
Repealed. 2015, No. 38, § 22, eff. May 28, 2015.